Washington statutes.
RCW 9.73.100

Recordings available to defense counsel.

Video and/or sound recordings obtained by police personnel under the authority of RCW 9.73.090 and 9.73.100 shall be made available for hearing and/or viewing by defense counsel at the request of defense counsel whenever a criminal charge has been filed against the subject of the video and/or sound recordings.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 48 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 48: See note following RCW 9.73.090.